Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 50 Correspondence Schools, Home Study, and Related Courses

16-50-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is recognized and declared that the publicizing, selling, and administering of courses of instruction by correspondence schools or home study courses, whether given in residence or by mail, proceed in accordance with acceptable practices and with consequent and important benefits to students pursuing these courses. It also is recognized that the benefits received from this instruction should be enhanced and the protection of those persons and institutions offering it should be established. It is the purpose of this chapter to supplement the general law of fraud so as to provide adequate protection for students, educational institutions, and the general public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.

16-50-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Correspondence school” means a school that teaches resident and nonresident students by mailing them lessons and exercises toward the achievement of some educational aim which upon completion are returned to the school for grading.

“Course” means any unit, plan, or program of instruction whether conducted in person, by mail, or by any other method by correspondence schools or home study courses.

“Home study course” means a course of instruction administered by mail and carried on in the student’s home.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.

16-50-3.
Exceptions from chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to any course:

Recognized by the state department of elementary and secondary education for purposes of complying in whole or in part with the provisions of §

16-19-1

and §

16-19-2

;

Offered by an educational institution accredited by the applicable national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the department of elementary and secondary education; or

Offered by an employer solely to his or her employees at no charge and as part of an in service training program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.

16-50-4.
Publicizing of instruction.

No person shall:

Make or cause to be made any statement or representation, oral, written, or visual, in connection with the offering or publicizing of a course, if the person knows or reasonably should have known the statement or representation to be false, deceptive, substantially inaccurate, or misleading.

Promise or guarantee employment utilizing information, training, or skill purported to be provided or enhanced by a course, unless the promisor or guarantor offers the student or prospective student a bona fide contract of employment agreeing to employ the student or prospective student for a period of not less than ninety (90) days in a business or other enterprise regularly conducted by him or her and in which the information, training, or skill is a normal condition of employment.

Do any act constituting part of the conduct or administration of a course, or the obtaining of students for the course, if the person knows or reasonably should know that any phase or incident of the conduct or administration of the course is being carried on by the use of fraud, deception, or other misrepresentation, or by any person soliciting students without a permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.

16-50-5.
Solicitation — Issuance and revocation of permits.

No person representing any school or other individual or organization offering courses in this state, or from a place of business in this state, shall sell any course or solicit students for a course in this state for a consideration or remuneration unless he or she first secures a permit from the department of elementary and secondary education. If the agent represents more than one school, a separate permit shall be obtained for each school represented by the agent. Upon approval for a permit the department of elementary and secondary education shall issue a pocket card to the person whose name appears on it, giving that person’s name and address, the name and address of his or her employing school, and certifying that the person whose name appears on the card is an authorized agent of the school. The application for a permit shall be made on forms to be furnished by the department of elementary and secondary education and shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and a surety bond acceptable to the department of elementary and secondary education in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The bond may be continuous and shall be conditioned to provide indemnification to any student suffering loss as a result of any fraud or misrepresentation used in procuring his or her enrollment, and may be supplied by the agent of a privately owned school and by the school itself as a blanket bond covering each of its agents and the school in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000). A permit shall be valid for one year from the date on which it was issued. The liability of the surety on the bond for each representative covered by it shall in no event exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) as an aggregate for any and all students for all breaches of the conditions of the bond by the representatives. The surety of any bond may cancel the bond upon giving thirty (30) days’ notice in writing to the department of elementary and secondary education and after this shall be relieved of liability for any breach of condition occurring after the effective date of the cancellation. An application for renewal shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and a surety bond, as provided in this subsection, if a continuous bond has not been furnished. All fees collected for the issuance or renewal of the permits shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

No person representing a school or other organization offering courses, which school or other organization is located outside this state, shall sell any course or solicit students for the course in this state for a consideration or remuneration unless that person first secures a permit from the department of elementary and secondary education in the manner and on the terms provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Any permit applied for pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be granted or denied within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the application for it by the department of elementary and secondary education. If the department of elementary and secondary education has not completed its determination with respect to the issuance of a permit pursuant to this section within this period, it shall issue a temporary permit to the applicant, which permit shall be sufficient to meet the requirements of this chapter until any time as the determination is made.

Any permit issued may, upon ten (10) days’ notice and after a hearing, be revoked by the department of elementary and secondary education if the holder of the permit solicits or enrolls students through fraud, deception, or misrepresentation.

The fact that a bond is in force pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not limit or impair any right of recovery available pursuant to law, nor shall the amount of damages or other relief to which any plaintiff may be entitled.

No recovery shall be had on any contract for or in connection with a course by any person selling or administering the course if the representative of the person was not the holder of a permit as required by this section and the representative did not display the permit at the time that the representative negotiated the contract for or sold the course.

The issuance of a permit pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to constitute approval of any course or the person or institution offering, conducting, or administering the course. Any representation contrary to this subsection or tending to imply that a permit issued pursuant to this section constitutes approval shall be misrepresentation within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 344, § 1.

16-50-6.
Rules and regulations — Advisory committee.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of §

16-50-5

and may establish an advisory committee of owners or operators of institutions to which this chapter applies and of other persons with knowledge in the fields to which this chapter applies, to advise it in its administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 344, § 1.

16-50-7.
Enforcement proceedings.

The attorney general or any local prosecuting officer, at the request of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or on his or her own motion, shall bring any appropriate action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 344, § 1.

16-50-8.
Judicial review.

Any action of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education respecting the issuance, denial, or revocation of a permit pursuant to §

16-50-5

shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 344, § 1.

16-50-9.
Criminal penalties.

Any act or omission in violation of this chapter shall be a misdemeanor and the violator shall be liable to a fine of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), a term of imprisonment not to exceed ninety (90) days, or both the fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.

16-50-10.
Litigation.

Any school or agent for a school, its or their assignees subject to this chapter, not the holder of a permit issued pursuant to this chapter, shall not be permitted to bring suit in any court of this state to recover on any matter arising out of the conduct of its business or activities in Rhode Island, and compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be a condition precedent to carrying on business in this state and to enforcing in any court of this state any contract or assignment of it made pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 140, § 1.